California statutes. Elections Code
(2) A recodification of the charter proposed by the governing body on its own motion, provided that the recodification does not, in any manner, substantially change the provisions of the charter.

(c) The following city or city and county charter proposals shall be submitted to the voters at an established statewide general, statewide primary, or regularly scheduled municipal election pursuant
 to Section 1200, 1201, or 1301 occurring not less than 88 days after the date of the order of election:

(1) An amendment or repeal of a city charter proposed by a petition signed by 15 percent of the registered voters of the city.

(2) An amendment or repeal of a
 city and county charter
 proposed by a petition signed by 10 percent of the registered voters of the city and county.

(d) Charter proposals by the governing body and charter proposals by petition of the voters may be submitted at the same election.

(e) The total number of registered voters of the city or city and county shall be determined according to the county elections official’s last official report of registration to the Secretary of State that was effective at the time the notice required pursuant to Section 9256 was given.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 184, Sec. 2.   (SB 311)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

9256.

The proponents of a measure proposing to amend a charter shall publish or post, or both, a notice of intent to circulate the petition in the same form and manner as prescribed in Sections 9202, 9203, 9204, and 9205. The proponents shall also file an affidavit prescribed in Section 9206 with the clerk of the legislative body of the city, and, with respect to the petition, shall be subject to Section 9207.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9257.

The petition signed by registered voters of the city or city and county proposing an amendment to a charter shall set forth in full the text of the proposed amendment, in no less than 10-point type.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9258.

The petition may be circulated in sections, but each section shall contain a correct copy of the text of the proposed amendment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9259.

Each signer of the petition shall sign it in the manner prescribed by Section 9020.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9260.

The petition shall be in substantially the following form:
Petition for Submission to Voters of Proposed Amendment to the Charter of the City (or City and County) of ____
To the city council (or other legislative body) of the City (or City and County) of ____:

We, the undersigned, registered and qualified voters of the State of California, residents of the City (or City and County) of ____, pursuant to Section 3 of Article XI of the California Constitution and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 34450) of Part 1 of Division 2
 of Title 4 of the Government Code, present to the city council (or other legislative body) of the city (or city and county) this petition and request that the following proposed amendment to the charter of the city (or city and county) be submitted to the registered and qualified voters of the city (or city and county) for their adoption or rejection at the next statewide general, statewide primary, or regularly scheduled municipal election pursuant to Section 1200, 1201, or 1301.

The proposed charter amendment reads as follows:
First. (setting forth the text of the amendment) ____ (etc.) SignaturePrinted NameResidenceDate

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 184, Sec. 3.   (SB 311)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

9261.

Each section shall have attached thereto the affidavit of the person soliciting the signatures. This affidavit shall be substantially in the same form as set forth in Section 9022 and shall comply with Sections 104 and 9209.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9262.

Each petition section shall consist of sheets of white paper, uniform in size, with dimensions no smaller than 812 by 11 inches or greater than 812 by 14 inches.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9263.

The sheets comprising each petition section shall be fastened together securely and remain so during circulation and filing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9264.

A voter may withdraw his or her signature from a petition in the manner prescribed in Section 9602.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9265.

The petition shall be filed with the elections official by the proponents, or by any person or persons authorized in writing by the proponents. All sections of the petition shall be filed at one time, and a petition section submitted subsequently may not be accepted by the elections official. The petition shall be filed (1) within 180 days from the date of receipt of the title and summary, or (2) after termination of any action for a writ of mandate pursuant to Section 9204, and, if applicable, receipt of an amended title or summary, or both, whichever comes
 later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 53, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

9266.

After the petition has been filed, the elections official shall examine the petition in the same manner as are county petitions in accordance with Sections 9114 and 9115, except that, for the purposes of this section, references in those sections to the board of supervisors shall be treated as references to the legislative body of the city or city and county. The expenses of signature verification shall be provided by the governing body receiving the petition from the elections official.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9266.5.

The proponent of a measure proposing to amend a charter may withdraw the charter amendment at any time before the 88th day before the election, whether or not the petition has already been found sufficient by the elections official.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 569, Sec. 3.   (SB 681)   Effective October 8, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

9267.

Petitions that do not substantially conform to the form requirements of this article shall not be accepted for filing by the elections official.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9268.

The conduct of election and publication requirements shall substantially conform with Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) and Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 10.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9269.

Upon the completion of the canvass of votes, the governing body of a city or city and county shall pass a resolution reciting the fact of the election and such other matters as are enumerated in Section 10264. The elections official of the city or city and county shall then cause the adopted measures to be submitted to the Secretary of State pursuant to Sections 34459 and 34460 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Arguments Concerning City Measures [9280. - 9287.]

9280.

Whenever a city measure qualifies for a place on the ballot, the governing body may direct the city elections official to transmit a copy of the measure to the city attorney, unless the organization or salaries of the office of the city attorney are affected. The city attorney shall prepare an impartial analysis of the measure showing the effect of the measure on the existing law and the operation of the measure. The analysis shall include a statement indicating whether the measure was placed on the ballot by a petition signed by the requisite number of voters or by the governing body of the city. If the measure affects the organization or salaries of the office of the city attorney, the governing board may direct the city elections official to prepare the impartial analysis.
 The analysis shall be printed preceding the arguments for and against the measure. The analysis shall not exceed 500 words in length.

If the entire text of the measure is not printed on the ballot, nor in the voter information guide, there shall be printed immediately below the impartial analysis, in no less than 10-point bold type, a legend substantially as follows:

“The above statement is an impartial analysis of Ordinance or Measure ____. If you desire a copy of the ordinance or measure, please call the elections official’s office at (insert telephone number) and a copy will be mailed at no cost to you.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 45.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

9281.

If no other method is provided by general law, or, in the case of a chartered city, by the charter or by city ordinance, arguments for and against any city measure may be submitted to the qualified voters of the city pursuant to this article. If a method is otherwise provided by general law, or, in the case of a chartered city, by charter or city ordinance, for submitting arguments as to a particular kind of city measure, that method shall control.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9282.

(a) For measures placed on the ballot by petition, the persons filing an initiative petition pursuant to this article may file a written argument in favor of the ordinance, and the legislative body may submit an argument against the ordinance.

(b) For measures placed on the ballot by the legislative body, the legislative body, or a member or members of the legislative body authorized by that body, or an individual voter who is eligible to vote on the measure, or bona fide association of citizens, or a combination of voters and associations, may file a written argument for or against any city measure.

(c) An argument shall not exceed 300 words in length.

(d) The city elections official shall include the following statement on the front cover, or if none, on the heading of the first page, of the printed arguments:

“Arguments in support or opposition of the proposed laws are the opinions of the authors.”

(e) The city elections official shall enclose a printed copy of both arguments with each voter information guide, but only those arguments filed pursuant to this section shall be printed and enclosed with the voter information guide. The printed arguments are “official matter” within the meaning of Section 13303.

(f) Printed arguments submitted to voters in
 accordance with this section shall be titled either “Argument In Favor Of Measure ____” or “Argument Against Measure ____,” accordingly, the blank spaces being filled in only with the letter or number, if any, designating the measure. At the discretion of the elections official, the word “Proposition” may be substituted for the word “Measure” in these titles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 46.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

9283.

A ballot argument may not be accepted under this article unless accompanied by the printed name and signature or printed names and signatures of the author or authors submitting it, or, if submitted on behalf of an organization, the name of the organization and the printed name and signature of at least one of its principal officers who is the author of the argument.

No more than five signatures shall appear with any argument submitted under this article. In case any argument is signed by more than five authors, the signatures of the first five shall be printed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 785, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

9285.

(a) (1) When an argument in favor and an argument against a measure have been selected to be printed in the voter information guide, the elections official shall send a copy of the argument in favor of the measure to the authors of the argument against the measure and a copy of an argument against the measure to the authors of the argument in favor of the measure.

(2) The author or a majority of the authors of an argument relating to a city measure may prepare and submit a rebuttal argument or may authorize in writing another person or persons to prepare, submit, or sign the rebuttal argument.

(3) A rebuttal argument shall not exceed 250 words.

(4) A rebuttal argument relating to a city measure shall be filed with the elections official no later than 10 days after the final filing date for primary arguments.

(5) A rebuttal argument relating to a city measure shall not be signed by more than five persons, shall be printed in the same manner as a direct argument, and shall immediately follow the direct argument which it seeks to rebut.

(b) Subdivision (a) applies only if, not later than the day on which the legislative body calls an election, the legislative body adopts its provisions by majority vote, in which case subdivision (a) applies at the next ensuing municipal election and at each municipal
 election thereafter, unless later repealed by the legislative body in accordance with the procedures of this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 47.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

9286.

(a) Based on the time reasonably necessary to prepare and print the arguments and voter information guides and to permit the 10-calendar-day public examination as provided in Article 6 (commencing with Section 9295) for the particular election, the city elections official shall fix a date 14 days from the calling of the election as a deadline, after which no arguments for or against a city measure may be submitted for printing and distribution to the voters, as provided in this article. Arguments may be changed or withdrawn by their proponents until and including the date fixed by the city elections official during the normal business hours of the elections official’s office, as posted.

(b) The requirement in subdivision (a) that the period for submitting arguments for inclusion with the voter information guide materials must be 14 days from the calling of the election does not apply when the election is consolidated with another election pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 10400) of Division 10.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 48.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

9287.

(a) If more than one argument for or more than one argument against any city measure is submitted to the city elections official within the time prescribed, he or she shall select one of the arguments in favor and one of the arguments against the measure for printing and distribution to the voters. In selecting the argument, the city elections official shall give preference and priority, in the order named, to the arguments of the following:

(1) The legislative body, or member or members of the legislative body authorized by that body.

(2) The individual voter, or bona fide association of citizens, or combination of voters and associations, who are the bona fide sponsors or proponents of the
 measure.

(3) Bona fide associations of citizens.

(4) Individual voters who are eligible to vote on the measure.

(b) In order to enable the city elections official to determine whether it qualifies as a bona fide association of citizens, an organization or association submitting an argument for or against a city measure shall submit with its argument a copy of one of the following:

(1) Its articles of incorporation, articles of association, partnership documents, bylaws, or similar documents.

(2) Letterhead containing the name of the organization and its principal officers.

(3) If the organization or association is a primarily
 formed committee established to support or oppose the measure, its statement of organization filed pursuant to Section 84101 of the Government Code.

(c) In selecting an argument from among bona fide associations of citizens, the city elections official shall not consider the type of documentation submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) or the form of the association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 63.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Mailings [9290. - 9290.]

9290.

Whenever the elections official is required to mail official matter, as provided in Sections 9223, 9280, 9281, 9282, and 9285, only one copy of each piece of official matter shall be mailed to a postal address where two or more registered voters have the same surname and the same postal address.

This section shall only apply if the legislative body of the city adopts this section and the election official conducting the election approves of the procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 286, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Public Examination [9295. - 9295.]

9295.

(a) The elections official shall make a copy of the material referred to in Sections 9223, 9280, 9281, 9282, and 9285 available for public examination in the elections official’s office for a period of 10 calendar days immediately following the filing deadline for submission of those materials. Any person may obtain a copy of the materials from the elections official for use outside of the elections official’s office. The elections official may charge a fee to any person obtaining a copy of the material. The fee may not exceed the actual cost incurred by the elections official in providing the copy.

(b) (1) During the 10-calendar-day public examination period provided by this section, any voter of the jurisdiction in which the election is being held, or the elections official, himself or herself, may seek a writ of mandate or an injunction requiring any or all of the materials to be amended or deleted. The writ of mandate or injunction request shall be filed no later than the end of the 10-calendar-day public examination period.

(2) A peremptory writ of mandate or an injunction shall be issued only upon clear and convincing proof that the material in question is false, misleading, or inconsistent with the requirements of this chapter, and that issuance of the writ or injunction will not substantially interfere with the printing or distribution of official election materials as provided by law.

(3) The elections official shall be named as respondent, and the person or official who authored the material in question shall be named as real parties in interest. In the case of the elections official bringing the mandamus or injunctive action, the board of supervisors of the county shall be named as the respondent and the person or official who authored the material in question shall be named as the real party in interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 286, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. District Elections [9300. - 9380.]



  ARTICLE 1. Initiative [9300. - 9323.]

9300.

In addition to any other method provided by law, ordinances may be enacted by any district pursuant to this article, except that this article shall not apply to irrigation districts, to a district formed under a law that does not provide a procedure for elections, to a district formed under a law which does not provide for action by ordinance, to a district governed by an election procedure that permits voters, in electing the district’s directors or trustees, to cast more than one vote per voter, or to a district in which the directors are empowered to cast more than one vote per director when acting on any matter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9301.

Any proposed ordinance may be submitted to the governing board of the district by an initiative petition filed with the district elections official. Signatures to these petitions shall be obtained in the same manner as set forth in Section 9020. Affidavits shall be attached to each petition section in the form and in the manner set forth in Section 9022.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9302.

Before circulating an initiative petition in any district, the proponents of that measure shall publish a notice of intention. The notice shall be accompanied by a printed statement stating the reasons for the proposed petition. The printed statement shall not exceed 500 words. The notice shall be signed by at least one, but not more than five, proponents, and shall be in substantially the following form:
 
“Notice of Intention to Circulate Initiative Petition

Notice is hereby given of the intention of the persons whose names appear hereon of their intention to circulate the petition within the ____ district for the purpose of ____. A statement of the reasons for the proposed action as contemplated in the petition is as follows:”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9303.

A notice of intention and statement as referred to in Section 9302 shall be published or posted, or both, as follows:

(a) If there is a newspaper of general circulation within the district, as described in Section 6000 of the Government Code, the notice and statement shall be published therein at least once.

(b) If the petition is to be circulated in a district in which there is no newspaper of general circulation, the notice and statement shall be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation within the county in which the district is located, and the notice and statement shall be posted in three public places within the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9304.

Within 10 days after the date of publication or posting, or both, of the notice of intention and statement of the reasons for the proposed petition, the proponents shall file with the district elections official a copy of the notice and statement as published or posted, or both, together with the written text of the initiative and an affidavit made by a representative of the newspaper in which the notice was published or, if the notice was posted, by a voter of the district certifying to the fact of publication or posting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 240, Sec. 3.   (AB 1851)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

9304.5.

From the time materials pertaining to an initiative petition are filed pursuant to Section 9304 until the day after the district elections official determines that the initiative petition does not contain the minimum number of signatures required, the day after the election at which the initiative measure is put before the voters, or the day after the proposed ordinance is adopted by the governing board of the district after being submitted to the governing board of the district pursuant to Section 9301, as applicable, the district elections official shall do both of the following:

(a) Keep on file at his or her office the notice of intention, statement of the reasons for the proposed petition, written text of the
 initiative, and affidavit of publication or posting that the proponents of the initiative measure filed with the district elections official pursuant to Section 9304.

(b) Furnish copies of the materials he or she is required to keep on file pursuant to subdivision (a) to any person upon request. The district elections official may charge a fee to a person obtaining copies pursuant to this subdivision. The fee may not exceed the actual cost incurred by the district elections official in providing the copies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 240, Sec. 4.   (AB 1851)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

9305.

After filing a copy of the notice of intention, statement of the reasons for the proposed petition, written text of the initiative, and affidavit of publication or posting with the district elections official pursuant to Section 9304, the petition may be circulated among the voters of the district for signatures by any person who meets the requirements of Section 102. Each section of the petition shall bear a copy of the notice of intention and statement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 278, Sec. 23.   (SB 213)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

9306.

Signatures upon petitions and sections thereof shall be secured, and the petition, together with all sections thereof, shall be filed within 180 days from the date of filing the materials specified in Section 9304 with the district elections official. If the petitions are not filed within the time permitted by this section, the petition and its sections shall be void for all purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 240, Sec. 6.   (AB 1851)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

9307.

Each section of the petition shall have attached thereto the affidavit of the person soliciting the signatures. This affidavit shall be substantially in the same form as set forth in Section 9022.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 278, Sec. 24.   (SB 213)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

9308.

(a) Except as provided in Section 9309, within 30 days from the date of filing of the petition, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, the district elections official shall examine the petition, and from the records of registration ascertain whether the petition is signed by the requisite number of voters. A certificate showing the results of this examination shall be attached to the petition.

(b) In determining the number of valid signatures, the district elections official may check the signatures against facsimiles of voters’ signatures, provided that the method of preparing and displaying the facsimiles complies with law. A signature shall not
 be invalidated because of a variation of the signature caused by the substitution of initials for the first or middle name, or both, of the person signing the petition.

(c) The district elections official shall notify the proponents of the petition as to the sufficiency or insufficiency of the petition.

(d) If the petition is found insufficient, no further action shall be taken. However, the failure to secure sufficient signatures, shall not preclude the filing of a new petition on the same subject, at a later date.

(e) If the petition is found sufficient, the district elections official shall certify the results of the examination to the governing board of the district at the next regular meeting of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 14, Sec. 5.   (AB 698)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

9309.

(a) Within 30 days from the date of filing of the petition, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, if, from the examination of petitions pursuant to Section 9308, more than 500 signatures have been signed on the petition, the district elections official may use a random sampling technique for verification of signatures. The random sample of signatures to be verified shall be drawn in such a manner that every signature filed with the elections official shall be given an equal opportunity to be included in the sample. A random sampling shall include an examination of at least 500 or 3 percent of the signatures, whichever is greater. A signature shall not be invalidated because of a variation of the signature caused by the substitution of
 initials for the first or middle name, or both, of the person signing the petition.

(b) If the statistical sampling shows that the number of valid signatures is within 95 to 110 percent of the number of signatures of qualified voters needed to declare the petition sufficient, the district elections official, within 90 days from the date of the filing of the petition, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, shall examine and verify each signature filed.

(c) In determining from the records of registration, what number of valid signatures are signed on the petition, the district elections official may check the signatures against facsimiles of voters’ signatures, provided that the method of preparing and displaying the facsimiles complies with law.

(d) The district elections official shall attach to the petition, a certificate showing the result of this examination, and shall notify the proponents of either the sufficiency or insufficiency of the petition.

(e) If the petition is found insufficient, no action shall be taken on the petition. However, the failure to secure sufficient signatures does not preclude the filing later of an entirely new petition to the same effect.

(f) If the petition is found to be sufficient, the district elections official shall certify the results of the examination to the governing board of the district at the next regular meeting of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 870, Sec. 3.   (SB 386)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9310.

(a) If the initiative petition is signed by voters not less in number than 10 percent of the voters in the district, if the total number of registered voters is less than 500,000, or not less in number than 5 percent of the voters in the district, if the total number of registered voters is 500,000 or more, the district board shall do either of the following:

(1) Adopt the ordinance, without alteration, either at the regular meeting at which the certification of the petition is presented, or within 10 days after it is presented.

(2) Submit the ordinance, without alteration, to the voters pursuant to Section 1405.

(b) The number of
 registered voters referred to in subdivision (a) shall be calculated as of the time of the last report of registration by the county elections official to the Secretary of State made before publication or posting of the notice of intention to circulate the initiative petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 64.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

9311.

The proponent of an initiative may withdraw the initiative at any time before the 88th day before the election, whether or not the petition has already been found sufficient by the elections official.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 155, Sec. 3.   (SB 1153)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

9312.

Whenever an ordinance is required by this article to be submitted to the voters of a district at an election, the district elections official shall cause the ordinance to be printed. A copy of the ordinance shall be made available to any voter upon request.

The district elections official shall mail with the
 voter information guide to each voter the following notice printed in no less than 10-point type.

“If you desire a copy of the proposed ordinance, please call the district elections official’s office at (insert telephone number) and a copy will be mailed at no cost to you.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 49.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

9313.

Except as provided in Section 9314, whenever a district measure is submitted to the voters, the district elections official shall transmit a copy of the measure to the county counsel, or to the district attorney if there is no county counsel, of the county that contains the largest number of registered voters of the district. The county counsel or district attorney shall prepare an impartial analysis of the measure showing the effect of the measure on the existing law and the operation of the measure. The analysis shall include a statement indicating whether the measure was placed on the ballot by a petition signed by the requisite number of voters or by the governing body of the district. The analysis shall be printed preceding the arguments for and against the
 measure. The analysis shall not exceed 500 words in length.

If the entire text of the measure is not printed on the ballot nor in the voter information guide, there shall be printed immediately below the impartial analysis, in no less than 10-point bold type, a legend substantially as follows:

“The above statement is an impartial analysis of Ordinance or Measure ____. If you desire a copy of the ordinance or measure, please call the district elections official’s office at (insert telephone number) and a copy will be mailed at no cost to you.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 50.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

9314.

(a) Whenever a district measure is submitted to the voters of a water district, the district elections official shall transmit a copy of the measure to the legal counsel for the water district, or to the county counsel if there is no legal counsel for the water district, of the county that contains the largest number of registered voters of the water district. Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), if there is a legal counsel for the water district, he or she shall prepare, subject to review and revision by the county counsel, an impartial analysis of the measure showing the effect of the measure on the existing law and the operation of the measure. The analysis shall include a statement indicating whether the measure was placed on the
 ballot by a petition signed by the requisite number of voters or by the governing body of the water district. The analysis shall be printed preceding the arguments for and against the measure. The analysis shall not exceed 500 words in length.

If the entire text of the measure is not printed on the ballot nor in the voter information guide, there shall be printed immediately below the impartial analysis, in no less than 10-point bold type, a legend substantially as follows:

“The above statement is an impartial analysis of Ordinance or Measure ____. If you desire a copy of the ordinance or measure, please call the district elections official’s office at (insert telephone number) and a copy will be mailed at no cost to you.”

(b) If there is no
 legal counsel for the water district, or if the legal counsel for the water district and the county counsel so agree, the county counsel shall prepare the impartial analysis.

(c) As used in this section:

(1) “Legal counsel for the water district” means the attorney designated under the district’s conflict of interest code as its legal officer pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 87300) of Chapter 7 of Title 9 of the Government Code.

(2) “County counsel” means the district attorney if there is no county counsel.

(3) “Water district” means a water district as defined in Section 20200 of the Water Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 51.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

9315.

The persons filing an initiative petition pursuant to this article may file a written argument in favor of the ordinance. The district board may submit an argument against the ordinance. Neither argument shall exceed 300 words in length, and both arguments shall be printed and mailed to each voter with the voter information guide for the election.

The following statement shall be printed on the front cover, or if none, on the heading of the first page, of the printed arguments:

“Arguments in support of or in opposition to the proposed laws are the opinions of the authors.”

Printed arguments submitted to
 voters in accordance with this section shall be titled either “Argument In Favor Of Measure ____” or “Argument Against Measure ____,” accordingly, the blank spaces being filled in only with the letter or number, if any, designating the measure. At the discretion of the district elections official, the word “Proposition” may be substituted for the word “Measure” in the titles. Words used in the title shall not be counted when determining the length of any argument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 52.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

9316.

Based on the time reasonably necessary to prepare and print the arguments and voter information guides, and to permit the 10-calendar-day public examination as provided in Article 4 (commencing with Section 9380) for the particular election, the district elections official charged with the duty of conducting the election shall fix and determine a reasonable date before the election for the submission to the district elections official of an argument in favor of and against the ordinance, and additional rebuttal arguments as provided in Section 9317. Arguments may be changed or withdrawn by their proponents until and including the date fixed by the district elections official.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 53.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

9317.

(a) When an argument in favor and an argument against a measure have been selected for publication in the voter information pamphlet the elections official responsible for conducting the election shall send copies of the argument in favor of the measure to the authors of the argument against the measure and copies of the arguments against the measure to the authors of the argument in favor. The authors may prepare and submit rebuttal arguments not exceeding 250 words, or may authorize in writing any other person or persons to prepare, submit, or sign the rebuttal argument. The rebuttal arguments shall be submitted to the elections official conducting the election no later than a date designated by the elections official.

(b) Rebuttal arguments shall be printed in the same manner as the direct arguments. Each rebuttal argument shall immediately follow the direct argument that it seeks to rebut and shall be titled “Rebuttal to Argument in Favor of Measure (or Proposition) ____,” or “Rebuttal to Argument Against Measure (or Proposition) ____,” the blank spaces being filled in only with the letter or number, if any, designating the measure. Words used in the title may not be counted when determining the length of any rebuttal argument.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 228, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

9319.

Any number of proposed ordinances may be voted upon at the same election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9320.

If a majority of the voters voting on a proposed ordinance vote in its favor, the ordinance shall become a valid and binding ordinance of the district. The ordinance shall be considered as adopted upon the date the vote is declared by the district board, and shall go into effect 10 days after that date.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9321.
